Maryland, session 2025, HB1426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
3–201.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the governing body of a
county is ex officio the board of health for the county.
3–203.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “BOARD” MEANS THE CARROLL COUNTY BOARD OF
COMMISSIONERS ACTING AS THE CARROLL COUNTY BOARD OF HEALTH UNDER §
3–201(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) “HEALTH DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE CARROLL COUNTY HEALTH
DEPARTMENT.
(B) AS REQUIRED UNDER § 3–201(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE CARROLL
COUNTY BOARD OF COMMISSIONERS IS THE BOARD OF HEALTH FOR CARROLL
COUNTY AND SHALL EXERCISE ALL POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE BOARD OF HEALTH
ESTABLISHED UNDER STATE AND LOCAL LAW.
(C) (1) THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH STANDARD OPERATING
PROCEDURES FOR THE HEALTH DEPARTMENT, INCLUDING PROCEDURES FOR THE
HEALTH AND SAFETY COMPLAINT SYSTEM AND COMPLAINT APPEALS PROCESS.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL DIRECT THE HEALTH DEPARTMENT TO:
(I) KEEP RECORDS OF HEALTH AND SAFETY COMPLAINTS; AND
(II) MAKE THE RECORDS AVAILABLE FOR INSPECTION UNDER
THE MARYLAND PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT, INCLUDING INSPECTION BY THE
CARROLL COUNTY DELEGATION TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, BUSINESS OWNERS
IN CARROLL COUNTY, AND RESIDENTS OF CARROLL COUNTY.
3–302.

HOUSE BILL 1426 3
(a) The health officer for a county shall be nominated by the county and appointed
by the Secretary.
(b) (1) The governing body of each county shall establish, by ordinance or
resolution, the process by which the county nominates an individual for health officer.
(2) If a vacancy occurs in the position of health officer for a county, the
governing body shall establish a process, in consultation with the Department, for making
a recommendation to the Secretary for the appointment of a health officer.
(3) The process established under paragraph (2) of this subsection shall
include the requirements for recruiting, interviewing, and recommending applicants for the
position of health officer.
(c) (1) If the Secretary finds that a nominee meets the qualifications of this
section, the Secretary shall appoint the nominee as health officer.
(2) If the Secretary finds that the nominee does not meet the qualifications
of this section, the Secretary shall reject the nomination, and the county shall provide the
Secretary with another nomination.
(d) Each health officer:
(1) Shall have:
(i) A master’s degree in public health and at least 2 years’ work in
the field of public health; or
(ii) At least 5 years’ work in the field of public health;
(2) Shall have any other qualifications and training in the field of public
health that the Secretary requires by rule or regulation; and
(3) Need not be a physician, if the health officer has a deputy who:
(i) Is a physician; and
(ii) Meets the qualifications of this subsection.
(e) Before taking office, each appointee to the office of health officer shall take the
oath required by Article I, § 9 of the Maryland Constitution.
(f) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO § 3–311(C)(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE health
officer for a county may be removed from office with the concurrence of the governing body
of that county and the Secretary.

HOUSE BILL 1426
(2) (i) Any information concerning the removal of a health officer from
office is confidential in accordance with Title 4 of the General Provisions Article.
(ii) Any meeting of the governing body of a county or any meeting
that includes the Secretary related to the removal of a health officer from office shall be
closed.
(3) (i) If the Secretary and the governing body concur on the removal of
a health officer, the Secretary shall provide written notification to the health officer that
includes:
1. The basis for the removal;
2. Documentation supporting the removal; and
3. Notice of the opportunity to request a hearing with the
Secretary within 10 days after receipt of the written notification and information on how
to request the hearing.
(ii) If the health officer requests a hearing with the Secretary:
1. The Secretary promptly shall hold a hearing, provided
that the hearing may not be held sooner than 10 days or later than 30 days after the
Secretary sends the health officer a notice of the removal;
2. The health officer shall have an opportunity to be heard
before the Secretary in the health officer’s defense; and
3. The Secretary shall make a final decision not later than 10
days after the date of the hearing.
(4) Not later than 30 days after the Secretary makes a decision under
paragraph (3) of this subsection, a health officer may request a hearing before the
appropriate circuit court to ensure that the proceedings for the removal of the health officer
were conducted in accordance with paragraph (3) of this subsection.
3–305.
(a) (1) The governing body of each county shall establish, by ordinance or
resolution, the process by which the county evaluates its health officer.
(2) The Secretary shall establish, by rule or regulation, the process by
which the Secretary evaluates health officers.
(b) (1) At least annually, the health officer for a county shall be evaluated, in
writing, by the Secretary and by the county.

HOUSE BILL 1426 5
(2) The Secretary and the county each shall review their respective
evaluations of a health officer with the health officer.
(3) THE CARROLL COUNTY BOARD OF COMMISSIONERS SHALL MAKE
ITS EVALUATION OF THE CARROLL COUNTY HEALTH OFFICER AVAILABLE TO THE
CARROLL COUNTY DELEGATION TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
3–311.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “BOARD” MEANS THE CARROLL COUNTY BOARD OF
COMMISSIONERS ACTING AS THE CARROLL COUNTY BOARD OF HEALTH UNDER §
3–201(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) “DEPUTY HEALTH OFFICER” MEANS A DEPUTY HEALTH OFFICER
IN THE CARROLL COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT.
(4) “HEALTH DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE CARROLL COUNTY HEALTH
DEPARTMENT.
(5) “HEALTH OFFICER” MEANS THE HEALTH OFFICER FOR THE
CARROLL COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT.
(B) (1) AT LEAST ANNUALLY, THE BOARD SHALL EVALUATE, IN WRITING,
EACH DEPUTY HEALTH OFFICER.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL MAKE ITS EVALUATION OF EACH DEPUTY
HEALTH OFFICER AVAILABLE TO THE CARROLL COUNTY DELEGATION TO THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(C) (1) IF THE HEALTH OFFICER OR A DEPUTY HEALTH OFFICER
RECEIVES TWO UNSATISFACTORY EVALUATIONS BY THE BOARD, THE BOARD MAY
REMOVE THE HEALTH OFFICER OR DEPUTY HEALTH OFFICER.
(2) THE REMOVAL OF THE HEALTH OFFICER UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE SECRETARY’S APPROVAL.
(3) IF THE BOARD REMOVES THE HEALTH OFFICER OR A DEPUTY
HEALTH OFFICER UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE BOARD SHALL
NOTIFY THE CARROLL COUNTY DELEGATION TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE
REMOVAL AND THE REASONS FOR THE REMOVAL.

HOUSE BILL 1426
(D) THE BOARD SHALL DIRECT THE HEALTH DEPARTMENT TO SUBMIT
WRITTEN EVALUATIONS OF ALL HEALTH DEPARTMENT EMPLOYEES TO THE HEALTH
OFFICER AND THE BOARD ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.